North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 5. Procedures for Admission and Discharge of Clients.
§ 122C-221.
Admissions.

Except as otherwise provided in this Part, a minor may be admitted to a facility if the minor is mentally ill or a substance abuser and in need of treatment. Except as otherwise provided in this Part, the provisions of

G.S. 122C-211

shall apply to admissions of minors under this Part. Except as provided in

G.S. 90-21.5

, in applying for admission to a facility, in consenting to medical treatment when consent is required, and in any other legal procedure under this Article, the legally responsible person shall act for the minor. The application of the minor shall be in writing and signed by the legally responsible person. If a minor reaches the age of 18 while in treatment under this Part, further treatment is authorized only on the written authorization of the client or under the provisions of Part 7 or Part 8 of Article 5 of this Chapter.

The Commission shall adopt rules governing procedures for admission to 24-hour facilities not falling within the category of facilities where freedom of movement is restricted. These rules shall be designed to ensure that no minor is improperly admitted to or improperly remains in a 24-hour facility.

History.

1973, c. 1084; 1983, c. 302, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1987, c. 370, s. 1; 2018-33, s. 15.

§ 122C-222.
Admissions to State facilities.

Admission of a minor who is a resident of a county that is not in a single portal area shall be made to a State facility following screening and upon referral by an area authority, a physician, or an eligible psychologist. Further planning of treatment and discharge for the minor is the joint responsibility of the State facility and the person making the referral.

History.

1987, c. 370, s. 1.

§ 122C-223.
Emergency admission to a 24-hour facility.

In an emergency situation, when the legally responsible person does not appear with the minor to apply for admission, a minor who is mentally ill or a substance abuser and in need of treatment may be admitted to a 24-hour facility upon his own written application. The application shall serve as the initiating document for the hearing required by

G.S. 122C-224

.

Within 24 hours of admission, the facility shall notify the legally responsible person of the admission unless notification is impossible due to an inability to identify, to locate, or to contact him after all reasonable means to establish contact have been attempted.

If the legally responsible person cannot be located within 72 hours of admission, the responsible professional shall initiate proceedings for juvenile protective services as described in Article 3 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes in either the minor’s county of residence or in the county in which the facility is located.

Within 24 hours of an emergency admission to a State facility, the State facility shall notify the area authority and, as appropriate, the minor’s physician or eligible psychologist. Further planning of treatment and discharge for the minor is the joint responsibility of the State facility and the appropriate person in the community.

History.

1973, c. 1084; 1983, c. 302, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1987, c. 370, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 13(ff).

§ 122C-224.
Judicial review of voluntary admission.

When a minor is admitted to a 24-hour facility where the minor will be subjected to the same restrictions on his freedom of movement present in the State facilities for the mentally ill, or to similar restrictions, a hearing shall be held by the district court in the county in which the 24-hour facility is located within 15 days of the day that the minor is admitted to the facility. A continuance of not more than five days may be granted.

Before the admission, the facility shall provide the minor and his legally responsible person with written information describing the procedures for court review of the admission and informing them about the discharge procedures. They shall also be informed that, after a written request for discharge, the facility may hold the minor for 72 hours during which time the facility may apply for a petition for involuntary commitment.

Within 24 hours after admission, the facility shall notify the clerk of court in the county where the facility is located that the minor has been admitted and that a hearing for concurrence in the admission must be scheduled. At the time notice is given to schedule a hearing, the facility shall (i) notify the clerk of the names and addresses of the legally responsible person and the responsible professional and (ii) provide the clerk with a copy of the legally responsible person’s written application for admission of the minor and the facility’s written evaluation of the minor, both of which are required under G.S. 122C-211(a).

History.

1975, c. 839; 1977, c. 756; 1979, c. 171, s. 1; 1983, c. 889, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1987, c. 370, s. 1; 2018-33, s. 16.

§ 122C-224.1.
Duties of clerk of court.

Within 48 hours of receipt of notice that a minor has been admitted to a 24-hour facility wherein his freedom of movement will be restricted, an attorney shall be appointed for the minor in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services. When a minor has been admitted to a State facility for the mentally ill, the attorney appointed shall be the attorney employed in accordance with G.S. 122C-270(a) through (c). All minors shall be conclusively presumed to be indigent, and it shall not be necessary for the court to receive from any minor an affidavit of indigency. The attorney shall be paid a reasonable fee in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services. The judge may require payment of the attorney’s fee from a person other than the minor as provided in

G.S. 7A-450.1

through

G.S. 7A-450.4

.

Upon receipt of notice that a minor has been admitted to a 24-hour facility wherein his freedom of movement will be restricted, the clerk shall calendar a hearing to be held within 15 days of admission for the purpose of review of the minor’s admission. Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given as provided in

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4(j) to the attorney in lieu of the minor, as soon as possible but not later than 72 hours before the scheduled hearing. Notice of the hearing shall be sent to the legally responsible person and the responsible professional as soon as possible but not later than 72 hours before the hearing by first-class mail postage prepaid to the individual’s last known address.

The clerk shall schedule all hearings and rehearings and send all notices as required by this Part.

History.

1987, c. 370, s. 1; 2000-144, s. 37.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Although a minor cannot obtain legal representation without the consent of the legally responsible person, the rights of the child can be adequately protected. First, the Department of Social Services can conduct an investigation of the legally responsible person pursuant to

G.S. 7A-542

et seq. [see now

G.S. 7B-300

et seq.], the guardian ad litem program can provide additional support for abused, neglected, or dependent juveniles, including legal support and, a minor receives representation for the commitment proceedings by virtue of this section and

G.S. 122C-270

. See opinion of Attorney General to C. Robin Britt, Sr., Secretary, Department of Human Resources, — N.C.A.G. — (December 20, 1995).

§ 122C-224.2.
Duties of the attorney for the minor.

The attorney shall meet with the minor within 10 days of his appointment but not later than 48 hours before the hearing. In addition, the attorney shall inform the minor of the scheduled hearing and shall give the minor a copy of the notice of the time and place of the hearing no later than 48 hours before the hearing.

The attorney shall counsel the minor concerning the hearing procedure and the potential effects of the hearing proceeding on the minor. If the minor does not wish to appear, the attorney shall file a motion with the court before the scheduled hearing to waive the minor’s right to be present at the hearing procedure except during the minor’s own testimony. If the attorney determines that the minor does not wish to appear before the judge to provide his own testimony, the attorney shall file a separate motion with the court before the hearing to waive the minor’s right to testify.

In all actions on behalf of the minor, the attorney shall represent the minor until formally relieved of the responsibility by the judge.

History.

1987, c. 370, s. 1.

§ 122C-224.3.
Hearing for review of admission.

Hearings shall be held at the 24-hour facility in which the minor is being treated, if it is located within the judge’s district court district as defined in

G.S. 7A-133

, unless the judge determines that the court calendar will be disrupted by such scheduling. In cases where the hearing cannot be held in the 24-hour facility, the judge may schedule the hearing in another location, including the judge’s chambers. The hearing may not be held in a regular courtroom, over objection of the minor’s attorney, if in the discretion of the judge a more suitable place is available.

The minor shall have the right to be present at the hearing unless the judge rules favorably on the motion of the attorney to waive the minor’s appearance. However, the minor shall retain the right to appear before the judge to provide his own testimony and to respond to the judge’s questions unless the judge makes a separate finding that the minor does not wish to appear upon motion of the attorney.

Certified copies of reports and findings of physicians, psychologists and other responsible professionals as well as previous and current medical records are admissible in evidence, but the minor’s right, through his attorney, to confront and cross-examine witnesses may not be denied.

Hearings shall be closed to the public unless the attorney requests otherwise.

A copy of all documents admitted into evidence and a transcript of the proceedings shall be furnished to the attorney, on request, by the clerk upon the direction of a district court judge. The copies shall be provided at State expense.

For an admission to be authorized beyond the hearing, the minor must be (1) mentally ill or a substance abuser and (2) in need of further treatment at the 24-hour facility to which he has been admitted. Further treatment at the admitting facility should be undertaken only when lesser measures will be insufficient. It is not necessary that the judge make a finding of dangerousness in order to support a concurrence in the admission.

The court shall make one of the following dispositions:

If the court finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the requirements of subsection (f) have been met, the court shall concur with the voluntary admission and set the length of the authorized admission of the minor for a period not to exceed 90 days; or

If the court determines that there exist reasonable grounds to believe that the requirements of subsection (f) have been met but that additional diagnosis and evaluation is needed before the court can concur in the admission, the court may make a one time authorization of up to an additional 15 days of stay, during which time further diagnosis and evaluation shall be conducted; or

If the court determines that the conditions for concurrence or continued diagnosis and evaluation have not been met, the judge shall order that the minor be released.

The decision of the District Court in all hearings and rehearings is final. Appeal may be had to the Court of Appeals by the State or by any party on the record as in civil cases. The minor may be retained and treated in accordance with this Part, pending the outcome of the appeal, unless otherwise ordered by the District Court or the Court of Appeals.

History.

1987, c. 370, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 113.

§ 122C-224.4.
Rehearings.

A minor admitted to a 24-hour facility upon order of the court for further diagnosis and evaluation shall have the right to a rehearing if the responsible professional determines that the minor is in need of further treatment beyond the time authorized by the court for diagnosis and evaluation.

A minor admitted to a 24-hour facility upon the concurrence of the court shall have the right to a rehearing for further concurrence in continued treatment before the end of the period authorized by the court. The court shall review the continued admission in accordance with the hearing procedures in this Part. The court may order discharge of the minor if the minor no longer meets the criteria for admission. If the minor continues to meet the criteria for admission the court shall concur with the continued admission of the minor and set the length of the authorized admission for a period not to exceed 180 days. Subsequent rehearings shall be scheduled at the end of each subsequent authorized treatment period, but no longer than every 180 days.

The responsible professional shall notify the clerk, no later than 15 days before the end of the authorized admission, that continued stay beyond the authorized admission is recommended for the minor. The clerk shall calendar the rehearing to be held before the end of the current authorized admission.

History.

1987, c. 370, s. 1.

§ 122C-224.5.
Transportation.

When it is necessary for a minor to be transported to a location other than the treating facility for the purpose of a hearing, transportation shall be provided under the provisions of

G.S. 122C-251

. However, the 24-hour facility may obtain permission from the court to routinely provide transportation of minors to and from hearings.

History.

1987, c. 370, s. 1.

§ 122C-224.6.
Treatment pending hearing and after authorization for or concurrence in admission.

Pending the initial hearing and after authorization for further diagnosis and evaluation, or concurrence in admission, the responsible professional may administer to the minor reasonable and appropriate medication and treatment that is consistent with accepted medical standards and consistent with Article 3 of this Chapter.

The responsible professional may release the minor conditionally for periods not in excess of 30 days on specified appropriate conditions. Violation of the conditions is grounds for return of the minor to the 24-hour facility. A law enforcement officer, on request of the responsible professional, shall take the minor into custody and return him to the facility in accordance with

G.S. 122C-205

.

History.

1987, c. 370, s. 1.

§ 122C-224.7.
Discharge.

The responsible professional shall unconditionally discharge a minor from treatment at any time that it is determined that the minor is no longer mentally ill or a substance abuser, or no longer in need of treatment at the facility.

The legally responsible person may file a written request for discharge from the facility at any time. The facility may hold the minor in the facility for 72 hours after receipt of the request for discharge. If the responsible professional believes that the minor is mentally ill and dangerous to himself or others, he may file a petition for involuntary commitment under the provisions of Part 7 of this Article. If the responsible professional believes that the minor is a substance abuser and dangerous to himself or others, he may file a petition for involuntary commitment under the provisions of Part 8 of this Article. If an order authorizing the holding of the minor under involuntary commitment procedures is issued, further treatment and holding shall follow the provisions of Part 7 or Part 8 whichever is applicable. If an order authorizing the holding of the minor under involuntary commitment procedures is not issued, the minor shall be discharged.

If a client reaches age 18 while in treatment, and the client refuses to sign an authorization for continued treatment within 72 hours of reaching 18, he shall be discharged unless the responsible professional obtains an order to hold the client under the provisions of Part 7 or Part 8 of this Article pursuant to an involuntary commitment.

History.

1975, c. 839; 1977, c. 756; 1979, c. 171, s. 1; 1983, c. 889, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1987, c. 370, s. 1.

§§ 122C-225 through 122C-229.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 4. Voluntary Admissions and Discharges,
Incompetent Adults, Facilities for the
Mentally Ill and Substance Abusers.

§ 122C-230.
Applicability of Part 4.

This Part applies to adults who are adjudicated incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction. This Part does not apply to the admission of adults who are deemed incapable but who have not been adjudicated incompetent.

History.

2018-33, s. 17.

§ 122C-231.
Admissions.

Except as otherwise provided in this Part an incompetent adult may be admitted to a facility when the individual is mentally ill or a substance abuser and in need of treatment. The provisions of

G.S. 122C-211

shall apply to admissions of an incompetent adult under this Part except that the legally responsible person shall act for the individual, in applying for admission to a facility, in consenting to medical treatment when consent is required, in giving or receiving any legal notice, and in any other legal procedure under this Article.

History.

1973, c. 1084; 1983, c. 302, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-232.
Judicial determination.

When an incompetent adult is admitted to a 24-hour facility where the incompetent adult will be subjected to the same restrictions on freedom of movement present in the State facilities for the mentally ill, or to similar restrictions, a hearing shall be held in the district court in the county in which the 24-hour facility is located within 10 days after the day the incompetent adult is admitted to the facility. A continuance of not more than five days may be granted upon motion [of] any of the following:

The court.

Respondent’s counsel.

The responsible professional.

The Commission shall adopt rules governing procedures for admission to other 24-hour facilities not falling within the category of facilities where freedom of movement is restricted; these rules shall be designed to ensure that no incompetent adult is improperly admitted to or remains in a facility.

(a1)

Prior to admission, the facility shall provide the incompetent adult and the legally responsible person with written information describing the procedures for court review of the admission and the procedures for discharge.

(a2)

Within 24 hours after admission, the facility shall notify the clerk of court of the county in which the facility is located that the incompetent adult has been admitted and that a hearing for concurrence in the admission must be scheduled. At the time the facility provides notice to the court to schedule a hearing for concurrence, the facility shall notify the clerk of the names and addresses of the legally responsible person and the responsible professional and provide a copy of the legally responsible person’s written application for evaluation or admission of the incompetent adult and the facility’s evaluation of the incompetent adult.

In any case requiring the hearing described in subsection (a) of this section, no petition is necessary; the written application for voluntary admission shall serve as the initiating document for the hearing. The court shall determine whether the incompetent adult is mentally ill or a substance abuser and is in need of further treatment at the facility. Further treatment at the facility should be undertaken only when lesser measures will be insufficient. If the court finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that these requirements have been met, the court shall concur with the voluntary admission of the incompetent adult and set the length of the authorized admission for a period not to exceed 90 days. If the court finds that these requirements have not been met, it shall order that the incompetent adult be released. A finding of dangerousness to self or others is not necessary to support the determination that further treatment should be undertaken.

Unless otherwise provided in this Part, the hearing specified in subsection (a) of this section, including the provisions for representation of indigent incompetent adults, all subsequent proceedings, and conditional release are governed by the involuntary commitment procedures of Part 7 of this Article.

In addition to the notice of hearings and rehearings to the incompetent adult and his or her counsel required under Part 7 of this Article, notice shall be given by the clerk to the legally responsible person or a successor to the legally responsible person. The legally responsible person or a successor to the legally responsible person may also file with the clerk of court a written waiver of the right to receive notice.

History.

1975, c. 839; 1977, c. 756; 1979, c. 171, s. 1; 1983, c. 889, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2018-33, s. 18.

§ 122C-233.
Discharges.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, an incompetent adult shall be discharged upon the request of the legally responsible person as provided in

G.S. 122C-212

.

After the court has concurred in the admission of an incompetent adult to a 24-hour facility as provided in

G.S. 122C-232

, only the facility or the court may release the incompetent adult at any time when either determines that the incompetent adult does not need further treatment at the facility. If the legally responsible person believes that release is in the best interest of the incompetent adult, and the facility refuses release, the legally responsible person may apply to the court for a hearing for discharge.

History.

1975, c. 839; 1977, c. 756; 1979, c. 171, s. 1; 1983, c. 889, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§§ 122C-234 through 122C-240.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 5. Voluntary Admissions and Discharges, Minors and Adults, Facilities for Individuals with Developmental Disabilities.

§ 122C-241.
Admissions.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, an individual with intellectual or other developmental disabilities may be admitted to a facility for individuals with intellectual or other developmental disabilities to receive care, habilitation, rehabilitation, training, or treatment. Application for admission is made as follows:

A minor with intellectual or other developmental disabilities may be admitted upon application by both the father and the mother if they are living together and, if not, by the parent or parents having custody or by the legally responsible person.

An adult with intellectual or other developmental disabilities who has been adjudicated incompetent under Chapter 35A or former Chapters 33 or 35 of the General Statutes may be admitted upon application by the adult’s guardian.

An adult with intellectual or other developmental disabilities who has not been adjudicated incompetent under Chapter 35A or former Chapters 33 or 35 of the General Statutes may be admitted upon the adult’s own application.

Prior to admission to a 24-hour facility, the individual shall be examined and evaluated by a physician or psychologist to determine whether the individual has a developmental disability. In addition, the individual shall be examined and evaluated by a qualified developmental disabilities professional no sooner than 31 days prior to admission or within 72 hours after admission to determine whether the individual is in need of care, habilitation, rehabilitation, training, or treatment by the facility. If the evaluating professional determines that the individual will not benefit from an admission, the individual shall not be admitted as a client.

An admission to an area or State 24-hour facility of an individual from a single portal area shall follow the procedures as prescribed in the area plan. When an individual from a single portal area presents himself or herself or is presented for admission directly to a State developmental center and is in need of an emergency admission, he or she may be accepted for admission. The State developmental center shall notify the area authority within 24 hours of the admission and further planning of treatment for the individual is the joint responsibility of the area authority and the State developmental center as prescribed in the area plan.

History.

1963, c. 1184, s. 6; 1965, c. 800, s. 12; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; 1977, c. 679, s. 7; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; 1983, c. 383, s. 7; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 14; 1989, c. 625, s. 22; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 26(d); 2019-76, s. 6.

§ 122C-242.
Discharges.

Except as provided in subsections (b) through (d) of this section, discharges from facilities for individuals with developmental disabilities are made upon request of the individual authorized in G.S. 122C-241(a) to make application for admission or by the director of the facility.

Any adult who has not been declared incompetent and who is admitted to a 24-hour facility shall be discharged upon his own request, unless the director of the facility has reason to believe that the adult is endangering himself by the discharge. In this case the individual may be held for a period not to exceed five days while the director petitions for the adjudication of incompetency of the individual and the appointment of an interim guardian under Chapter 35A of the General Statutes.

Any individual admitted to a 24-hour facility may be discharged when in the judgment of the director of the facility the individual is no longer in need of care, treatment, habilitation or rehabilitation by the facility or the individual will no longer benefit from the service available. In the case of an area or State facility rules adopted by the Commission or by the Secretary in accordance with

G.S. 122C-63

shall be followed.

When the individual to be discharged from an area or State 24-hour facility is a resident of a single portal area, the discharge shall follow the procedures described in the area plan.

History.

1963, c. 1184, s. 6; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; 1983, c. 383, s. 8; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 625, s. 22; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 26(c).

§§ 122C-243 through 122C-250.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 6. Involuntary Commitment — General Provisions.

§ 122C-251.
Custody and transportation.

Except as provided in subsections (c), (f), and (g) [of this section], transportation of a respondent within a county under the involuntary commitment proceedings of this Article, including admission and discharge, shall be provided by the city or county. The city has the duty to provide transportation of a respondent who is a resident of the city or who is physically taken into custody in the city limits. The county has the duty to provide transportation for a respondent who resides in the county outside city limits or who is physically taken into custody outside of city limits. However, cities and counties may contract with each other to provide transportation.

Except as provided in subsections (c), (f), and (g) [of this section] or in

G.S. 122C-408(b)

, transportation between counties under the involuntary commitment proceedings of this Article for a first examination as described in G.S. 122C-263(a) and G.S. 122C-283(a) and for admission to a 24-hour facility shall be provided by the county where the respondent is taken into custody. Transportation between counties under the involuntary commitment proceedings of this Article for respondents held in 24-hour facilities who have requested a change of venue for the district court hearing shall be provided by the county where the petition for involuntary commitment was initiated. Transportation between counties under the involuntary commitment proceedings of this Article for discharge of a respondent from a 24-hour facility shall be provided by the county of residence of the respondent. However, a respondent being discharged from a facility may use his own transportation at his own expense.

Transportation of a respondent may be (i) by city- or county-owned vehicles, (ii) by private vehicle by contract with the city or county, or (iii) as provided in an agreement developed and adopted under subsection (g) of this section and

G.S. 122C-202.2

. To the extent feasible, law enforcement officers transporting respondents shall dress in plain clothes and shall travel in unmarked vehicles. Further, law enforcement officers, to the extent possible, shall advise respondents when taking them into custody that they are not under arrest and have not committed a crime, but are being taken into custody and transported to receive treatment and for their own safety and that of others.

To the extent feasible, in providing transportation of a respondent, a city or county shall provide a driver or attendant who is the same sex as the respondent, unless the law enforcement officer allows a family member of the respondent to accompany the respondent in lieu of an attendant of the same sex as the respondent.

In taking custody and providing transportation as required by this section, the law enforcement officer may use reasonable force to restrain the respondent if it appears necessary to protect the law enforcement officer, the respondent, or others. Any use of restraints shall be as reasonably determined by the officer to be necessary under the circumstances for the safety of the respondent, the law enforcement officer, and other persons. Every effort to avoid restraint of a child under the age of 10 shall be made by the transporting officer unless the child’s behavior or other circumstances dictate that restraint is necessary. The law enforcement officer shall respond to all inquiries from the facility concerning the respondent’s behavior and the use of any restraints related to the custody and transportation of the respondent, except in circumstances where providing that information is confidential or would otherwise compromise a law enforcement investigation. No law enforcement officer or other person designated or required to provide custody or transport of a client under

G.S. 122C-251

may be held criminally or civilly liable for assault, false imprisonment, or other torts or crimes on account of reasonable measures taken under the authority of this Article.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section, a clerk, a magistrate, or a district court judge, where applicable, may authorize either a health care provider of the respondent or the family or immediate friends of the respondent, if they so request, to transport the respondent in accordance with the procedures of this Article. This authorization shall only be granted in cases where the danger to the public, the health care provider of the respondent, the family or friends of the respondent, or the respondent himself or herself is not substantial. The health care provider of the respondent or the family or immediate friends of the respondent shall bear the costs of providing this transportation.

The governing body of a city or county shall adopt a plan known as an “involuntary commitment transportation agreement” or “transportation agreement” for the custody and transportation of respondents in involuntary commitment proceedings under this Article as follows:

Law enforcement and other affected agencies, including local acute care hospitals and other mental health providers, shall participate in developing the transportation agreement. The area authority may participate in developing the transportation agreement.

The transportation agreement may designate law enforcement officers, volunteers, or other public or private personnel who have agreed pursuant to subsection (g) of this section to provide all or parts of the custody and transportation required by involuntary commitment proceedings. Persons so designated or otherwise required to provide all or parts of the custody and transportation required by involuntary commitment proceedings shall be trained as set forth in G.S. 122C-202.2(a)(3), and the plan shall assure adequate safety and protections for both the public and the respondent. Any person or agency designated or required to provide all or parts of the custody and transportation required by involuntary commitment proceedings shall follow the procedures in this Article. References in this Article to a law enforcement officer apply to any person or entity designated to provide custody or transportation. The transportation agreement may provide that private personnel or agencies may contract for transportation services to transport respondents under involuntary commitment from one entity to another.

A person shall not be designated under subsection (g) of this section without that person’s written consent and the written consent of his or her employer, if applicable. An agency, corporation, or entity shall not be designated without the written consent of that agency, corporation, or entity. Any person, agency, corporation, or other entity shall be designated to provide only the services which the person, agency, corporation, or other entity has previously consented in writing to provide and shall be permitted to withdraw from or discontinue providing services, in whole or in part, upon written notice to the designating governing body. The transportation agreement shall be submitted to the magistrates in the city or county’s judicial district, to the county clerks of court, to the LME/MCO that serves the city or county, and to the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services on or before January 1, 2019. If the city or county modifies the transportation agreement, it will submit the modified agreement to their magistrates in their judicial district, county clerks of court, the LME/MCO that serves the city or county, and the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the new plan.

Counties and cities shall retain and be required to perform the responsibilities set forth in this Article, except as set forth in a plan developed, agreed upon, and adopted in compliance with this subsection.

The cost and expenses of custody and transportation of a respondent as required by the involuntary commitment procedures of this Article, to the extent they are not reimbursed by a third-party insurer, are the responsibility of the county of residence of the respondent. The State (when providing transportation under

G.S. 122C-408(b)

), a city, or a county is entitled to recover the reasonable cost of transportation from the county of residence of the respondent. The county of residence of the respondent shall reimburse the State, another county, or a city the reasonable transportation costs incurred as authorized by this subsection. The county of residence of the respondent is entitled to recover the reasonable cost of transportation it has paid to the State, a city, or a county. Provided that the county of residence provides the respondent or other individual liable for the respondent’s support a reasonable notice and opportunity to object to the reimbursement, the county of residence of the respondent may recover that cost from:

The respondent, if the respondent is not indigent;

Any person or entity that is legally liable for the resident’s support and maintenance provided there is sufficient property to pay the cost;

Any person or entity that is contractually responsible for the cost; or

Any person or entity that otherwise is liable under federal, State, or local law for the cost.

History.

1899, c. 1, s. 32; Rev., s. 4555; 1919, c. 326, s. 4; C.S., ss. 6201, 6202; 1945, c. 952, ss. 29, 30; 1953, c. 256, s. 6; 1961, c. 186; 1963, c. 1184, s. 1; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 1408, s. 1; 1979, c. 915, ss. 21, 22; 1983, c. 138, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1987, c. 268; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 739, s. 4; 1999-201, s. 1; 1999-456, s. 36; 2015-176, s. 2.5(a); 2018-33, s. 19; 2019-240, s. 26(f); 2021-138, s. 6(a).

Local Modification.

Ashe:
2013-114, s. 1; Cumberland:
2013-114, s. 1; Wilkes:
2013-114, s. 1.

§ 122C-252.
Twenty-four hour facilities for custody and treatment of involuntary clients.

State facilities, 24-hour facilities licensed under this Chapter or hospitals licensed under Chapter 131E may be designated by the Secretary as facilities for the custody and treatment of involuntary clients. Designation of these facilities shall be made in accordance with rules of the Secretary that assure the protection of the client and the general public. Facilities so designated may detain a client under the procedures of Parts 7 and 8 of this Article both before a district court hearing and after commitment of the respondent.

History.

1973, c. 726, s. 1; c. 1408, s. 1; 1977, c. 400, s. 4; c. 679, s. 8; c. 739, s. 1; 1979, c. 358, s. 27; c. 915, s. 4; 1983, c. 380, ss. 4, 10; c. 638, ss. 6, 7, 25.1; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§ 122C-253.
Fees under commitment order.

Nothing contained in Parts 6, 7, or 8 of this Article requires a private physician, private psychologist, commitment examiner, or private facility to accept a respondent as a client either before or after commitment. Treatment at a private facility or by a private physician, psychologist, or commitment examiner is at the expense of the respondent to the extent that the charges are not disposed of by contract between the area authority and the private facility. An area authority and its contract agencies shall set and recover fees for inpatient or outpatient treatment services provided under a commitment order in accordance with

G.S. 122C-146

.

History.

1973, c. 726, s. 1; c. 1408, s. 1; 1977, c. 400, s. 8; c. 739, s. 2; 1979, c. 358, s. 26; c. 915, ss. 8, 15, 16; 1981, c. 537, s. 1; 1983, c. 380, s. 8; c. 638, s. 14; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 3; 2018-33, s. 20.